California, session 20252026, AB2584.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Preemptive Self Defense Act of 2026.SEC. 2. Section 50 of the Civil Code is amended to read:50. (a) Any necessary force may be used to protect from wrongful injury the person or property of oneself, or of a spouse, child, parent, or other relative, or member of one’s family, or of a ward, servant, master, or guest.(b) (1) There shall not be any civil liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall accrue against, a person who lawfully resists a public offense, as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 692) of Title 1 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.(2) This subdivision does not apply to a person who was the primary aggressor and subsequently suffers injury or to a person who used force that was not proportional to the reasonably perceived threat.SEC. 3.Section 692 of the Penal Code is amended to read:692.Lawful resistance to the commission of a public offense may be made:(a)(1)By the party about to be injured, including by a party who reasonably perceives an imminent threat of bodily harm.(2)For the purposes of this subdivision, “imminent threat of bodily harm” means an action that reasonably indicates a physical attack is about to occur, including, but not limited to, a deliberate feint, fake strike, or other aggressive movement intended to provoke a reaction or create fear of an immediate attack.(b)By other parties.SEC. 4.Section 693 of the Penal Code is amended to read:693.(a)Resistance sufficient to prevent the offense may be made by the party about to be injured:(1)To prevent an offense against their person, their family, or a member of their family.(2)To prevent an illegal attempt by force to take or injure property in their lawful possession.(b)The resistance authorized by this section shall be proportional to the reasonably perceived threat and shall cease when the threat is no longer present.(c)A party resisting an imminent threat of bodily harm, as defined in Section 692, shall not be required to wait until a physical attack has begun before taking reasonable defensive action. In determining whether a party has taken reasonable defensive action, the party’s background, training, and professional fighting skills shall not be taken into account.